en: prepacked Bearnaise sauce
fr: Sauce béarnaise préemballée
it: salsa bernese preconfezionata

en: pesto, pesto sauce, Prepacked pesto sauce
xx: pesto
ar: البيستو
ba: песто
be: песта
bg: песто
el: πέστο
fa: پستو
fr: sauce pesto, Sauce pesto préemballée
he: פסטו
hy: պեստո
is: pestó
ja: ペスト・ジェノヴェーゼ
ko: 페스토
pl: pesto
ru: песто
th: เปสโต
uk: песто
zh: 香蒜醬

en: Margarine
xx: margarin
ar: سمن نباتي
be: Маргарын
bg: Маргарин
bn: মার্জারিন
ca: margarina
cs: Margarín
cy: Marjarîn
da: Margarine
de: Margarine
el: Μαργαρίνη
eo: margarino
es: margarina
et: Margariin
eu: Margarina
fa: مارگارین
fi: margariini
fr: margarine
fy: margarine
ga: Buíoc
gl: Margarina
gu: માર્જરિન
he: מרגרינה
hi: मार्जरीन
hr: margarin
hy: Մարգարին
io: Margarino
is: Smjörlíki
it: margarina
ja: マーガリン, バター入りマーガリン
kk: Маргарин
kn: ಮಾರ್ಗರೀನ್‌
ko: 마가린
lt: Margarinas
mk: Маргарин
ms: Marjerinnb:margarin
ne: मार्गरिन
nl: margarine
oc: margarine
pl: Margaryna, margaryny
pt: margarina
ro: Margarină
ru: маргарин
sk: Margarín
sl: Margarina
sr: маргарин
tg: Маргарин
th: เนยเทียม
tt: маргарин
uk: маргарин
vi: Bơ thực vật
zh: 植物牛油

en: vegetable margarine, vegetal margarine
bg: растителен маргарин
cs: rostlinný margarín
da: vegetabiliskt margarin
de: Pflanzliche Margarine, Pflanzenmargarine
es: Margarina vegetal
fi: kasvismargariini, kasvimargariini
fr: margarine végétale
hr: biljni margarin
it: margarina vegetale
nl: plantaardige margarine
nn: vegetabiliskt margarin
pl: margaryna roślinna
pt: margarina vegetal
sk: rastlinný margarín
sv: vegetabiliskt margarin

en: Solid vegetable fat for frying
fr: Matière grasse ou graisse végétale solide pour friture
it: grasso vegetale solido per friggere

en: 50-63% unsalted vegetable fat high in omega 3
fr: Matière grasse végétale allégée à 50-63% riche en oméga 3

en: 50-63% unsalted vegetable fat with plant sterols esters
fr: Matière grasse végétale allégée à 50-63% aux esters de stérol végétal

en: 50-63% unsalted vegetable fat
fr: Matière grasse végétale allégée à 50-63%

en: 70% unsalted vegetable fat
fr: Matière grasse végétale à 70%

en: 80% unsalted vegetable fat
fr: Matière grasse végétale à 80%

en: almond milk
fr: lait d'amande

en: vegan bacon
nl: veganistische ham

en: kombucha
xx: kombucha
de: Kombucha
pl: kombucha, kombucza

en: raw kombucha
de: Roher Kombucha
fr: Combucha cru, Kombucha cru
hr: sirova kombucha
it: kombucha crudo

en: nonpareils, nonpareilles
de: liebesperlen, nonpareille
fi: nonparelli
fr: nonpareille
hr: nonpareils
it: palline di zucchero
nl: musketzaad
sv: nonparell

en: pisto
de: Pisto, Pisto Manchego
es: pisto
hr: pisto
it: pisto

en: glue
de: Leim
es: encolante
hr: ljepilo
it: colla

en: stir-fry, sofrito
ca: sofregit
de: Sofrito
es: sofrito
hr: pržiti uz miješanje

en: hummus, houmous
xx: hummus
ar: حمص بطحينة
az: humus
be: хумус
bg: хумус
bn: হুম্মুস
br: houmous
cy: hwmws
de: Hummus
el: χούμους
eo: kikerkaĉo
fa: حمص
fr: houmous, hummus
he: חומוס
hi: हुम्मुस
hu: hummusz
hy: հումուս
ja: フムス
ka: ჰუმუსი
kn: ಹುಮುಸ್
ko: 훔무스
ku: humûs
lt: humusas
mk: хумус
ml: ഹമ്മൂസ്
ne: हम्मस
pa: ਹੰਮਸ
pl: hummus
ro: hummus, humus
ru: хумус
sr: хумус
sv: hummus, original hummus, hummus original
th: ฮัมมัส
tl: humus
tr: humus
uk: хумус
ur: حمص
zh: 鹰嘴豆泥

en: chili hummus
sv: hummus med chili, hummus chili